Utah statutes.
19-6-405.5.   Creation of restricted account.
(1)  There is created in the General Fund a restricted account known as the
Petroleum Storage Tank Restricted Account.
(2)  All penalties and interest imposed under this part shall be deposited in
this account, except as provided in Section 19-6-410.5.  Specified program
funds under this part that are unexpended at the end of the fiscal year lapse
into this account.
(3)  The Legislature shall appropriate the money in the account to the
department for the costs of administering the petroleum storage tank program
under this part.
